District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.05

Department of Employment Services; education efforts.

The DOES shall develop courses of instruction and conduct ongoing public education efforts as necessary to inform employers, employees, employment agencies, and job applicants about their rights and responsibilities under this chapter.

History

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 6, 61 DCR 11368